Virginia statutes. Title 33.2. Highways and Other Surface Transportation Systems.
Article 4. Abandonment of Highways for Flooding Secondary Highways in Connection with Municipal Water Supply Projects.

§ 33.2-927.
Abandonment of highway in area to be flooded in connection with municipal water supply projects.

When a city or town that owns and operates a waterworks system that supplies the city or town and its inhabitants with water finds it necessary to increase its water supply such that it requires impounding the water of a stream outside the corporate limits of such city or town by means of a dam erected in such stream and the impounding of the water thereof would result in the overflow, or flooding, of a section or sections of a highway or highways within the secondary state highway system that necessitates the alteration and relocation of the highway or highways and the governing body of the city or town by ordinance declares (i) such necessity and (ii) that it is the intention of such city or town to comply with the requirements of this article, then the highway proposed to be flooded may be discontinued and abandoned but only after the city or town has complied with the provisions and requirements of this article.

History.

Code 1950, § 33-82; 1970, c. 322, § 33.1-168; 2014, c. 805.

§ 33.2-928.
Procedure to secure abandonment of highways to be flooded in connection with municipal water supply projects.

A city or town subject to the provisions of this article shall certify to the governing body of the county within which the highway, or the greater part thereof, lies a copy of the ordinance adopted by the city or town as provided in this article. The governing body of the county, upon receipt, shall within 30 days (i) consider the reasonableness of the action contemplated by the city or town ordinance, (ii) propose and publish an ordinance approving or disapproving the action contemplated by the city or town, and (iii) conduct a hearing thereon. In the event that after such hearing the governing body of the county disapproves the proposed flooding, discontinuance, and abandonment of the highway, the city or town shall have the right to an appeal to the circuit court of the county where the question of the reasonableness of the proposed flooding and abandonment shall be heard de novo by the circuit court and judgment shall be rendered according to its decision. The judgment of the circuit court may be appealed to the Court of Appeals.

History.

Code 1950, § 33-83; 1970, c. 322, § 33.1-169; 2014, c. 805; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 489.

Editor’s note.

Acts
2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 489, cl. 3 provides: “That any case for which a notice of appeal to the Supreme Court has been filed prior to January 1, 2022, shall continue in the Supreme Court of Virginia and shall not be affected by the provisions of this act.”

Acts
2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 489, cl. 4 provides: “That any case for which a petition for appeal in a criminal case to the Court of Appeals has been filed prior to January 1, 2022, and a decision on such petition remains pending, such petition for appeal shall be deemed granted and the clerk of the Court of Appeals shall certify the granting of such petition to the trial court and all counsel. Such case shall be considered mature for purposes of further proceedings from the date of such certificate.”

Acts
2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 489, cl. 6 provides: “That the provisions of this act amending
§

17.1-400

of the Code of Virginia shall become effective in due course and that the remaining provisions of this act shall become effective on January 1, 2022.”

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 489, effective January 1, 2022, rewrote the last sentence, which read: “From the judgment a writ of error will lie in the discretion of the Supreme Court of Virginia.”

§ 33.2-929.
Plans for relocation of highways in connection with municipal water supply projects.

If there is a final approval of the abandonment of the highway by the governing body of the county or by the court, the city or town shall, solely at its own expense, submit to the Commissioner of Highways plans and specifications for a proposed relocation of the highway, containing such information and facts as a location, elevations, and other matters the Commissioner of Highways may require. The Commissioner of Highways shall have the power to change, alter, and amend the plans in order to conform to the views of the Commissioner of Highways as to the location, width, and type of construction of such highway to be built on the new location, provided that the new highway is located such that it will not be flooded by the water to be impounded, and provided further that the Commissioner of Highways may not require a more expensive type or character of highway than the one to be abandoned. The Commissioner of Highways shall approve such plans and specifications either as proposed by the city or town or as amended by the Commissioner of Highways.

History.

Code 1950, § 33-84; 1970, c. 322, § 33.1-170; 2014, c. 805.

§ 33.2-930.
Acquisition of lands for relocation.

Upon the approval of plans and specifications by the Commissioner of Highways, the city or town shall, solely at its own expense and in the name of the Commonwealth, acquire either by purchase or condemnation the right-of-way necessary to construct the highway on the new location as shown by the plans approved by the Commissioner of Highways. In the event of condemnation, the proceedings shall be instituted in the name of the city or town and shall conform to the proceedings that would be applicable if they had been instituted by the Commissioner of Highways. However, when the award has been paid, the title to the lands acquired in the proceedings shall vest in the Commonwealth in the same manner as if the Commissioner of Highways had instituted and conducted the proceedings and had paid the award.

History.

Code 1950, § 33-85; 1970, c. 322, § 33.1-171; 2014, c. 805.

§ 33.2-931.
Costs of relocation.

The city or town shall pay out of its own funds all costs incident to all surveys, plans, specifications, blueprints, or other matters relating to the relocation of the highway and the entire cost of acquiring, by purchase or by condemnation, the right-of-way.

History.

Code 1950, § 33-86; 1970, c. 322, § 33.1-172; 2014, c. 805.

§ 33.2-932.
Construction of relocated highway.

Upon the acquisition of a right-of-way as provided in this article, the city or town shall grade such right-of-way and construct the highway required, in accordance with the plans and specifications approved by the Commissioner of Highways.

History.

Code 1950, § 33-87; 1970, c. 322, § 33.1-173; 2014, c. 805.

§ 33.2-933.
Approval or disapproval of construction.

When a highway is completed, the city or town shall notify the Commissioner of Highways, who shall promptly cause an inspection to be made by the Department. If the Department approves the highway construction, the Commissioner of Highways shall notify the city or town in writing of such fact. If the Department disapproves the highway construction, it shall notify the city or town, specifying the Department’s objections and recommendations for remedying or removing them, and the city or town shall promptly carry out such recommendations.

History.

Code 1950, § 33-88; 1970, c. 322, § 33.1-174; 2014, c. 805.

§ 33.2-934.
New highway part of secondary state highway system; former highway to vest in city or town.

When the city or town has been notified by the Commissioner of Highways of final approval of the construction of the highway, such highway shall immediately become a part of the secondary state highway system, and the public shall be vested with the same rights of travel on such highway as it possesses with respect to the other highways in the system. The part of the highway that it is proposed to flood shall be deemed to be abandoned, and all public rights therein shall vest in the city or town.

History.

Code 1950, § 33-89; 1970, c. 322, § 33.1-175; 2014, c. 805.